District of Columbia statutes.
18-301

Estates disposable by will.

The real and personal estate of a person, which may pass by deed or gift, or which would, in case of the owner’s dying intestate, descend to or devolve upon his heirs or other legal representatives, may be disposed of, transferred, and passed by his last will, testament, or codicil in accordance with this part.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 687, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Cross References

Creation of estates in land, powers, see §§ 42-1001 et seq., 42-501 et seq.
Devise to spouse in lieu of dower, see § 19-112.
Election of spouse in lieu of will provisions, see §§ 19-113, 19-114.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-301.
1973 Ed., § 18-301.

References in Text

“This part,” referred to in this section, is Division III of the D.C. Official Code, Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations.